Illinois, session 104th, SB24.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Missing Persons Identification Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5, 10, 20, and 25 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 722/5)7    Sec. 5. Missing person reports. 8    (a-1) Law enforcement policy. Law enforcement agencies 9shall adopt a policy regarding missing person investigations 10and missing person reporting and follow-up actions. 11    (a-5) (a) Report acceptance. Law All law enforcement 12agencies shall accept without delay any report of a missing 13person and may attempt to obtain a DNA sample from the missing 14person or a DNA reference sample created from family members' 15DNA samples for submission under paragraph (1) of subsection 16(c) of Section 10. Acceptance of a missing person report filed 17in person may not be refused on any ground. A No law 18enforcement agency may not establish or maintain a policy that 19requires the observance of a waiting period before accepting a 20missing person report, and it may not may refuse to accept a 21missing person report:22        (1) on the basis that the missing person is an adult;23        (2) on the basis that the circumstances do not   SB0024 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    indicate foul play;2        (3) on the basis that the person has been missing for a 3    short period of time;4        (4) on the basis that the person has been missing for a 5    long period of time; 6        (5) on the basis that there is no indication that the 7    missing person was in the jurisdiction served by the law 8    enforcement agency at the time of the disappearance;9        (6) on the basis that the circumstances suggest that 10    the disappearance may be voluntary; 11        (7) (blank); on the basis that the reporting 12    individual does not have personal knowledge of the facts;13        (8) on the basis that the reporting individual cannot 14    provide all of the information requested by the law 15    enforcement agency;16        (9) on the basis that the reporting individual lacks a 17    familial or other relationship with the missing person; or 18        (9-5) on the basis of the missing person's mental 19    state or medical condition. ; or 20        (10) for any other reason.21    (a-10) Multiple reports for same missing person. If the 22law enforcement agency learns through investigation that a 23missing person report has been filed by another law 24enforcement agency for the same missing person and is under 25active investigation by that agency and if a missing person 26entry is active in the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System   SB0024 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1(LEADS), then the law enforcement agency may not draft an 2additional missing person report but shall draft an 3informational report detailing the interview of the reporting 4individual. The informational report shall be forwarded to the 5original law enforcement agency handling the missing person 6case without delay. A second or subsequent agency is not 7prohibited from entering a duplicate missing person report in 8LEADS; however, only one LEADS missing person report is 9required. Any existing LEADS missing person report may be 10modified by the originating agency to include additional or 11updated information. 12    (b) Manner of reporting. All law enforcement agencies 13shall accept missing person reports in person. Law enforcement 14agencies are encouraged to accept reports by phone or by 15electronic or other media to the extent that such reporting is 16consistent with law enforcement policies or practices. 17    (c) Contents of report. In accepting a report of a missing 18person, the law enforcement agency shall attempt to gather 19relevant information relating to the disappearance. The law 20enforcement agency shall attempt to gather at the time of the 21report information that shall include, but shall not be 22limited to, the following:23        (1) the name of the missing person, including 24    alternative names used; 25        (2) the missing person's date of birth; 26        (3) the missing person's identifying marks, such as   SB0024 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    birthmarks, moles, tattoos, and scars; 2        (4) the missing person's height and weight; 3        (5) the missing person's gender;4        (6) the missing person's race;5        (7) the missing person's current hair color and true 6    or natural hair color; 7        (8) the missing person's eye color;8        (9) the missing person's prosthetics, surgical 9    implants, or cosmetic implants; 10        (10) the missing person's physical anomalies;11        (11) the missing person's blood type, if known;12        (12) the missing person's driver's license number, if 13    known;14        (13) the missing person's social security number, if 15    known; 16        (14) a photograph of the missing person; recent 17    photographs are preferable and the agency is encouraged to 18    attempt to ascertain the approximate date the photograph 19    was taken;20        (15) a description of the clothing the missing person 21    was believed to be wearing; 22        (16) a description of items that might be with the 23    missing person, such as jewelry, accessories, and shoes or 24    boots; 25        (17) information on the missing person's electronic 26    communications devices, such as cellular telephone numbers   SB0024 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    and e-mail addresses; 2        (18) the reasons why the reporting individual believes 3    that the person is missing;4        (19) the name and location of the missing person's 5    school or employer, if known; 6        (20) the name and location of the missing person's 7    dentist or primary care physician or provider, or both, if 8    known;9        (21) any circumstances that may indicate that the 10    disappearance was not voluntary;11        (22) any circumstances that may indicate that the 12    missing person may be at risk of injury or death; 13        (23) a description of the possible means of 14    transportation of the missing person, including make, 15    model, color, license number, and Vehicle Identification 16    Number of a vehicle;17        (24) any identifying information about a known or 18    possible abductor or person last seen with the missing 19    person, or both, including:20            (A) name; 21            (B) a physical description;22            (C) date of birth;23            (D) identifying marks; 24            (E) the description of possible means of 25        transportation, including make, model, color, license 26        number, and Vehicle Identification Number of a   SB0024 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1        vehicle; 2            (F) known associates; 3        (25) any other information that may aid in locating 4    the missing person; and 5        (26) the date of last contact.6    (c-5) Collection of evidence. Nothing prohibits the 7collection of photographs, documents, biological samples, 8dental charts, radiographs, or fingerprints at the start of a 9missing person investigation.10    (c-10) LEADS entry requirement. Using the information 11gathered in subsection (c) for the missing person report, the 12law enforcement agency shall immediately enter a missing 13person report in LEADS. 14    (d) Notification and follow up action.15        (1) Notification. The law enforcement agency shall 16    notify the person making the report, a family member, a 17    person responsible for the missing person's welfare, or 18    other person in a position to assist the law enforcement 19    agency in its efforts to locate the missing person of the 20    following: 21            (A) general information about the handling of the 22        missing person case or about intended efforts in the 23        case to the extent that the law enforcement agency 24        determines that disclosure would not adversely affect 25        its ability to locate or protect the missing person or 26        to apprehend or prosecute any person criminally   SB0024 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1        involved in the disappearance;2            (A-5) information regarding the collection of 3        documents and biological samples that could assist in 4        the identification of a missing person, including 5        dental charts and radiographs, medical records, 6        fingerprints, and biological samples from the person's 7        personal items or from the missing person's immediate 8        biological family members;9            (B) that the person should promptly contact the 10        law enforcement agency if the missing person remains 11        missing in order to provide additional information and 12        materials that will aid in locating the missing person 13        such as the missing person's credit cards, debit 14        cards, banking information, and cellular telephone 15        records; and16            (C) that any DNA samples provided for the missing 17        person case are provided on a voluntary basis and will 18        be used solely to help locate or identify the missing 19        person and will not be used for any other purpose.20        The law enforcement agency, upon acceptance of a 21    missing person report, shall inform the reporting citizen 22    of one of 2 resources, based upon the age of the missing 23    person. If the missing person is under 18 years of age, 24    contact information for the National Center for Missing 25    and Exploited Children shall be given. If the missing 26    person is age 18 or older, contact information for the   SB0024 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    National Missing and Unidentified Persons System (NamUs) 2    organization shall be given.3        The law enforcement agency is encouraged to make 4    available informational materials, through publications or 5    electronic or other media, that advise the public about 6    how the information or materials identified in this 7    subsection are used to help locate or identify missing 8    persons. 9        (2) Follow up action. If the person identified in the 10    missing person report remains missing for 60 after 30 days 11    after the date of the report, but not more than 60 days, 12    then the law enforcement agency shall immediately may 13    generate a report of the missing person within the 14    National Missing and Unidentified Persons System (NamUs), 15    and the law enforcement agency shall may attempt to obtain 16    all of the following the additional information and 17    materials that have not been received, specified below:18            (A) Additional photographs of the missing person 19        that may aid the investigation or identification of an 20        unidentified person, including photographs of the 21        missing person's scars, marks, and tattoos. All 22        photographs of the missing person that the law 23        enforcement agency collected shall be added to the 24        National Missing and Unidentified Persons System 25        (NamUs) record. The law enforcement agency is not 26        required to obtain written authorization before it   SB0024 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1        releases publicly a photograph that would aid in the 2        investigation or location of the missing person. DNA 3        samples from family members or from the missing person 4        along with any needed documentation, or both, 5        including any consent forms, required for the use of 6        State or federal DNA databases, including, but not 7        limited to, the Local DNA Index System (LDIS), State 8        DNA Index System (SDIS), National DNA Index System 9        (NDIS), and National Missing and Unidentified Persons 10        System (NamUs) partner laboratories;11            (B) Fingerprint records of the missing person from 12        a competent authority or from a criminal history 13        database, if available. If a missing person remains 14        missing for 30 days after the date of the police 15        report, then the missing person's fingerprint record 16        shall be added to the missing person entry in the Law 17        Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS). If a missing 18        person remains missing for 60 days after the date of 19        the police report, then the missing person's 20        fingerprint record shall be entered in the National 21        Missing and Unidentified Persons System(NamUs). The 22        fingerprint records may be used for direct comparison 23        to the fingerprint records of unidentified persons 24        only. an authorization to release dental or skeletal 25        x-rays of the missing person; 26            (C) (Blank). any additional photographs of the   SB0024 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1        missing person that may aid the investigation or an 2        identification; the law enforcement agency is not 3        required to obtain written authorization before it 4        releases publicly any photograph that would aid in the 5        investigation or identification of the missing person; 6            (D) Dental charts and radiographs of the missing 7        person, if available. If a missing person remains 8        missing for 60 days after the date of the police report 9        and missing for 60 days after the date of the police 10        report in the National Missing and Unidentified 11        Persons System (NamUs), then the missing person's 12        dental record shall be added to the missing person 13        entry in the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System 14        (LEADS). The dental records may be used only for 15        direct comparison to the dental records of 16        unidentified persons. dental information and x-rays; 17        and 18            (E) Biological samples from closely related family 19        members of the missing person or biological samples 20        from personal items of the missing person, along with 21        any consent forms, required for the entry of a DNA 22        profile in the Combined DNA Index System, including, 23        but not limited to, the Local DNA Index System (LDIS), 24        State DNA Index System (SDIS), and National DNA Index 25        System (NDIS) fingerprints. 26        (3) Biological samples Samples collected for DNA   SB0024 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    analysis, if any, shall may be submitted to a Combined DNA 2    Index System (CODIS) National Missing and Unidentified 3    Persons System (NamUs) partner laboratory or other 4    accredited laboratory resource where DNA profiles are 5    entered into local, State, and national DNA Index Systems 6    within 90 60 days from the date of the police report. The 7    Illinois State Police laboratories shall establish 8    procedures for determining how to prioritize analysis of 9    the samples relating to missing person cases. All 10    biological DNA samples and subsequent DNA profiles, if 11    any, obtained in missing person cases from family members 12    of the missing person or personal items of the missing 13    person may not be retained after the location or 14    identification of the remains of the missing person unless 15    there is a search warrant signed by a court of competent 16    jurisdiction. 17        (4) This subsection shall not be interpreted to 18    preclude a law enforcement agency from attempting to 19    obtain the materials identified in this subsection before 20    the expiration of the specified periods. 30-day period. 21    The responsible law enforcement agency may make a National 22    Missing and Unidentified Persons System (NamUs) report on 23    the missing person within 60 days after the report of the 24    disappearance of the missing person.25        (5) Law enforcement agencies are encouraged to 26    establish written protocols for the handling of missing   SB0024 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    person cases to accomplish the purposes of this Act. Law 2    enforcement agencies may not close a missing person case 3    until the missing person has returned or been located, 4    either alive or deceased. Law enforcement agencies shall 5    keep cases under active investigation until the missing 6    person is located or returned. Reasons for closing a 7    missing person case may not include exhaustion of leads or 8    termination of the anticipated life span of the missing 9    person. 10(Source: P.A. 101-266, eff. 1-1-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 11    (50 ILCS 722/10)12    Sec. 10. Law enforcement analysis and reporting of missing 13person information. 14    (a) Prompt determination and definition of a high-risk 15missing person.16        (1) Definition. "High-risk missing person" means a 17    person whose whereabouts are not currently known and whose 18    circumstances indicate that the person may be at risk of 19    injury or death. The circumstances that indicate that a 20    person is a high-risk missing person include, but are not 21    limited to, any of the following: 22            (A) the person is missing as a result of a stranger 23        abduction; 24            (B) the person is missing under suspicious 25        circumstances;  SB0024 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1            (C) the person is missing under unknown 2        circumstances; 3            (D) the person is missing under known dangerous 4        circumstances; 5            (E) the person is missing more than 60 days 30 6        days; 7            (F) the person has already been designated as a 8        high-risk missing person by another law enforcement 9        agency; 10            (G) there is evidence that the person is at risk 11        because: 12                (i) the person is in need of medical 13            attention, including but not limited to persons 14            with dementia-like symptoms, or prescription 15            medication; 16                (ii) the person does not have a pattern of 17            running away or disappearing; 18                (iii) the person may have been abducted by a 19            non-custodial parent; 20                (iv) the person is mentally impaired, 21            including, but not limited to, a person having a 22            developmental disability, as defined in Section 23            1-106 of the Mental Health and Developmental 24            Disabilities Code, or a person having an 25            intellectual disability, as defined in Section 26            1-116 of the Mental Health and Developmental   SB0024 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1            Disabilities Code; 2                (v) the person is under the age of 21; 3                (vi) the person has been the subject of past 4            threats or acts of violence; 5                (vii) the person has gone missing eloped from 6            a facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care 7            Act nursing home;8            (G-5) the person is a veteran or active duty 9        member of the United States Armed Forces, the National 10        Guard, or any reserve component of the United States 11        Armed Forces who is believed to have a physical or 12        mental health condition that is related to his or her 13        service; or 14            (H) any other factor that may, in the judgment of 15        the law enforcement official, indicate that the 16        missing person may be at risk.17    (b) Law enforcement risk assessment.18        (1) Upon initial receipt of a missing person report, 19    the law enforcement agency shall immediately determine 20    whether there is a basis to determine that the missing 21    person is a high-risk missing person. 22        (2) If a law enforcement agency has previously 23    determined that a missing person is not a high-risk 24    missing person, but obtains new information, it shall 25    immediately determine whether the information indicates 26    that the missing person is a high-risk missing person.   SB0024 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1        (3) Law enforcement agencies are encouraged to 2    establish written protocols for the handling of missing 3    person cases to accomplish the purposes of this Act. 4    (c) Law enforcement reporting. 5        (1) Upon receipt of a missing person report, the The 6    responding local law enforcement agency shall immediately 7    enter all collected information relating to the missing 8    person case in the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System 9    (LEADS) and the National Crime Information Center (NCIC). 10    The database entries shall remain on file indefinitely or 11    until action is taken by the originating agency to clear 12    or cancel the record. In addition, if the missing person 13    remains missing for 60 days after the date of report, the 14    law enforcement agency shall immediately generate a report 15    of the missing person within the National Missing and 16    Unidentified Persons System (NamUs) as required under 17    paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 5 databases and 18    the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System 19    (NamUs) within 45 days after the receipt of the report, or 20    in the case of a high risk missing person, within 30 days 21    after the receipt of the report. If the DNA sample 22    submission is to a National Missing and Unidentified 23    Persons System (NamUs) partner laboratory, the DNA profile 24    may be uploaded by the partner laboratory to the National 25    DNA Index System (NDIS). A packet submission of all 26    relevant reports and DNA samples may be sent to the   SB0024 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    National Missing and Unidentified Persons System (NamUs) 2    within 30 days for any high-risk missing person cases. The 3    information shall be provided in accordance with 4    applicable guidelines relating to the databases. The 5    information shall be entered as follows:6            (A) For If Illinois State Police laboratories or 7        other accredited laboratories, all are utilized in 8        lieu of National Missing and Unidentified Persons 9        System (NamUs) partner laboratories, all appropriate 10        DNA profiles, as determined by the Illinois State 11        Police, shall be uploaded into the appropriate index 12        missing person databases of the State DNA Index System 13        (SDIS) and National DNA Index System (NDIS) after 14        completion of the DNA analysis and other procedures 15        required for database entry. The responding local law 16        enforcement agency shall attempt to collect and may 17        submit any DNA samples voluntarily obtained from 18        family members to an accredited Combined DNA Index 19        System (CODIS) a National Missing and Unidentified 20        Persons System (NamUs) partner laboratory for DNA 21        analysis within 90 30 days from the date of the police 22        report. A notation of DNA submission may be made 23        within the National Missing and Unidentified Persons 24        System (NamUs) record. 25            (B) If the missing person remains missing for 60 26        days from the date of report and if reporting   SB0024 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1        requirements for entry into Information relevant to 2        the Federal Bureau of Investigation's Violent Criminal 3        Apprehension Program are met, the law enforcement 4        agency shall enter the missing person case into the 5        Federal Bureau of Investigation's Violent Criminal 6        Apprehension Program database be entered as soon as 7        possible. 8            (C) The Illinois State Police or other assigned 9        law enforcement agency shall ensure that persons 10        entering data relating to medical or dental records in 11        State or federal databases are specifically trained to 12        understand and correctly enter the information sought 13        by these databases. The Illinois State Police shall 14        either use a person with specific expertise in medical 15        or dental records for this purpose or consult with a 16        chief medical examiner, forensic anthropologist, or 17        odontologist to ensure the accuracy and completeness 18        of information entered into the State and federal 19        databases. 20        (2) The Illinois State Police shall immediately notify 21    all law enforcement agencies within this State and the 22    surrounding region of the information that will aid in the 23    prompt location and safe return of the high-risk missing 24    person. 25        (3) The local law enforcement agencies that receive 26    the notification from the Illinois State Police shall   SB0024 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    notify officers to be on the lookout for the missing 2    person or a suspected abductor. 3        (4) Pursuant to any applicable State criteria, local 4    law enforcement agencies shall also provide for the prompt 5    use of an Amber Alert in cases involving abducted 6    children; or use of the Endangered Missing Person Advisory 7    in appropriate high-risk missing person high risk cases.8(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-266, eff. 1-1-21; 9102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (50 ILCS 722/20)11    Sec. 20. Unidentified persons or human remains 12identification responsibilities. 13    (a) In this Section, "assisting law enforcement agency" 14means a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction acting under 15the request and direction of the medical examiner or coroner 16to assist with human remains identification. 17    (a-5) If the official with custody of the human remains is 18not a coroner or medical examiner, the official shall 19immediately notify the coroner or medical examiner of the 20county in which the remains were found. The coroner or medical 21examiner shall go to the scene and take charge of the remains.22    (b) Notwithstanding any other action deemed appropriate 23for the handling of the human remains, the assisting law 24enforcement agency, medical examiner, or coroner shall make 25reasonable attempts to promptly identify human remains. This   SB0024 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1does not include historic or prehistoric skeletal remains. 2These actions shall include, but are not limited to, obtaining 3the following when possible: 4        (1) photographs of the human remains (prior to an 5    autopsy); 6        (2) dental and skeletal radiographs X-rays; 7        (3) photographs of items found on or with the human 8    remains; 9        (4) fingerprints from the remains; 10        (5) tissue samples suitable for DNA analysis; 11        (6) (blank); and 12        (7) any other information that may support 13    identification efforts. 14    (c) No medical examiner or coroner or any other person 15shall dispose of, or engage in actions that will materially 16affect the unidentified human remains before the assisting law 17enforcement agency, medical examiner, or coroner obtains items 18essential for human identification efforts listed in 19subsection (b) of this Section. 20    (d) Cremation of unidentified human remains is prohibited. 21    (e) (Blank). 22    (f) The assisting law enforcement agency, medical 23examiner, or coroner shall seek support from appropriate State 24and federal agencies, including National Missing and 25Unidentified Persons System resources to facilitate prompt 26identification of human remains. This support may include, but   SB0024 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1is not limited to, fingerprint comparison; forensic 2odontology; nuclear or mitochondrial DNA analysis, or both; 3and forensic anthropology. 4    (f-5) In this subsection, "local, State, and federal 5automated fingerprint identification system databases" 6includes: 7        (1) local criminal history repositories;8        (2) the Illinois State Police Automated Biometric 9    Identification System (ABIS), both criminal and civil, and 10    any successor databases; and11        (3) the Next Generation Integrated Automated 12    Fingerprint Identification System (NGI) and other federal 13    fingerprint databases, including immigration and military 14    databases and the Repository for Individuals of Special 15    Concern (RISC), and any successor databases. 16    It is the responsibility of the submitting agency to 17ensure the following steps are completed in the following 18order:19        (1) Fingerprints from unidentified human remains, 20    including partial prints, if any, shall be submitted for 21    analysis within 7 days of recovery of the remains by the 22    assisting law enforcement agency, medical examiner, or 23    coroner to all local, State, and federal automated 24    fingerprint identification system databases.25        (2) The submitting agency shall ensure fingerprints 26    are appropriately searched for identification purposes.  SB0024 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1    If there are no matches in any of the local, State, and 2federal automated fingerprint identification system databases, 3the unidentified fingerprint records shall be uploaded to the 4National Missing and Unidentified Persons System (NamUs) 5within 60 days after recovery of the remains. If no matches are 6made in the local, State, and federal automated fingerprint 7identification system databases, the submitting agency may 8contact the International Criminal Police Organization 9(INTERPOL) to search through the automated fingerprint 10identification system databases of member countries if remains 11are believed to have an international nexus. If the 12fingerprint analysis does not aid in the identification of the 13remains, then the assisting law enforcement agency, coroner, 14or medical examiner shall cause a dental examination to be 15performed by a forensic odontologist within 45 days of 16recovery of the remains for the purpose of dental charting, 17direct comparison to missing person dental records, and 18uploading to the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) and 19National Missing and Unidentified Persons System (NamUs). If 20the fingerprint and dental analysis does not aid in the 21identification of the remains, then blood, tissue, or bone 22samples from the unidentified remains shall be submitted for 23DNA analysis within 90 days of the recovery of the remains to a 24Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) accredited laboratory where 25DNA profiles are entered into the National DNA Index System 26upon completion of testing. In the case of markedly decomposed   SB0024 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1or skeletal remains, a forensic anthropological analysis of 2the remains, authorized by the coroner or medical examiner, 3shall also be performed within 60 days from the recovery and 4preparation of the remains for the analysis. 5     Fingerprints from the unidentified remains, including 6partial prints, shall be submitted to the Illinois State 7Police or other resource for the purpose of attempting to 8identify the deceased. The coroner or medical examiner shall 9cause a dental examination to be performed by a forensic 10odontologist for the purpose of dental charting, comparison to 11missing person records, or both. Tissue samples collected for 12DNA analysis shall be submitted within 30 days of the recovery 13of the remains to a National Missing and Unidentified Persons 14System partner laboratory or other resource where DNA profiles 15are entered into the National DNA Index System upon completion 16of testing. Forensic anthropological analysis of the remains 17shall also be considered. 18    (g) (Blank). 19    (g-2) The medical examiner or coroner shall report the 20unidentified human remains and the location where the remains 21were found to the Illinois State Police within 24 hours of 22discovery and then to the Federal Bureau of Investigation 23within 72 hours of discovery if the remains are not identified 24as mandated by Section 15 of this Act. The assisting law 25enforcement agency, medical examiner, or coroner shall cause 26contact the Illinois State Police to request the entry   SB0024 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1creation of a National Crime Information Center Unidentified 2Person record within 5 days of the discovery of the remains. In 3the case of markedly decomposed or skeletal remains, the 4creation of a National Crime Information Center (NCIC) 5Unidentified Person File shall be made upon receipt of the 6anthropological analysis report. The assisting law enforcement 7agency, medical examiner, or coroner shall provide the 8assisting law enforcement agency with the Illinois State 9Police all information required for the National Crime 10Information Center (NCIC) entry. Upon receipt of this 11information notification, the assisting law enforcement agency 12Illinois State Police shall create the Unidentified Person 13record without unnecessary delay. In the case of markedly 14decomposed or skeletal remains, the creation of a National 15Crime Information Center (NCIC) Unidentified Person File shall 16be made upon receipt of the anthropological analysis report. 17If an anthropological analysis report determines the remains 18to be historic or prehistoric, then no NCIC entry is required. 19    (g-5) The assisting law enforcement agency, medical 20examiner, or coroner shall obtain a National Crime Information 21Center number from the assisting law enforcement agency 22Illinois State Police to verify entry and maintain this number 23within the unidentified human remains case file. A National 24Crime Information Center Unidentified Person record shall 25remain on file indefinitely or until action is taken by the 26originating agency to clear or cancel the record. The   SB0024 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1assisting law enforcement agency, medical examiner, or coroner 2shall notify the assisting law enforcement agency Illinois 3State Police of necessary record modifications or cancellation 4if identification is made. 5    (h) (Blank). 6    (h-5) No later than 60 days following the discovery of the 7remains, the The assisting law enforcement agency, medical 8examiner, or coroner shall create an unidentified person 9record in the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System 10prior to the submission of samples or within 30 days of the 11discovery of the remains, if no identification has been made. 12The entry shall include all available case information, 13including fingerprint data and dental radiographs and charts. 14Samples shall be submitted to a National Missing and 15Unidentified Persons System partner laboratory for DNA 16analysis within 30 Days. A notation of DNA submission shall be 17made within the National Missing and Unidentified Persons 18System Unidentified Person record. 19    (i) Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to preclude 20any assisting law enforcement agency, medical examiner, 21coroner, or the Illinois State Police from pursuing other 22efforts to identify human remains including efforts to 23publicize information, descriptions, or photographs related to 24the investigation. An assisting law enforcement agency, a 25medical examiner, a coroner, or the Illinois State Police may 26not close an unidentified person case until the individual has   SB0024 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1been identified. Law enforcement agencies, medical examiners, 2and coroners shall keep such cases under active investigation 3until the person is identified. Reasons for closing an 4unidentified person case may not include exhaustion of leads 5or termination of the anticipated life span of the missing 6person's next of kin. 7    (j) For historic or prehistoric human skeletal remains 8determined by an anthropologist to be older than 100 years, 9jurisdiction shall be transferred to the Department of Natural 10Resources for further investigation under the Archaeological 11and Paleontological Resources Protection Act. 12(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-869, eff. 1-1-23.) 14    (50 ILCS 722/25)15    Sec. 25. Unidentified deceased persons. The coroner, or 16medical examiner, or assisting law enforcement agency shall 17obtain a biological DNA sample from any individual whose 18remains are not identifiable. The biological DNA sample shall 19be forwarded to an accredited Combined DNA Index System 20(CODIS) laboratory where DNA profiles are entered into a 21National Missing and Unidentified Persons System partner 22laboratory or other resource for analysis and inclusion in the 23appropriate State and National DNA Index System within 90 days 24from the discovery of the remains.25    Prior to the burial or interment of any unknown   SB0024 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 06956 RTM 16993 b1individual's remains or any unknown individual's body part, 2the medical examiner or coroner in possession of the remains 3or body part must assign a case DNA log number to the unknown 4individual or body part. The medical examiner or coroner shall 5place a stainless-steel tag that is stamped or inscribed with 6the assigned case DNA log number on the individual or body part 7and on the outside of the burial container. The DNA log number 8shall be stamped on the unidentified individual's toe tag, if 9possible.10(Source: P.A. 100-901, eff. 1-1-19.)